Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2738
Violation; penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any person violating the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or any rule, regulation, or order of the director adopted, promulgated, or issued pursuant to the act or who engages in any act, practice, or transaction declared by the act to be unlawful is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) A person who intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation, or false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or who intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in such a record is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(3) An individual who knowingly engages in money transmission for which a license is required under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act without being licensed under the act is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 38;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 43.